Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.900

Transfer of powers, duties, functions, and assets of department of general administration.

(1) The department of general administration is hereby abolished and its powers, duties, and functions are transferred to the department of enterprise services. All references to the director or department of general administration in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the department of enterprise services.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the department of general administration shall be delivered to the custody of the department of enterprise services. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department of general administration shall be made available to the department of enterprise services. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the department of general administration shall be assigned to the department of enterprise services.

(b) Any appropriations made to the department of general administration shall, on October 1, 2011, be transferred and credited to the department of enterprise services.

(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All rules and all pending business before the department of general administration shall be continued and acted upon by the department of enterprise services. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the department of enterprise services.

(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department of general administration shall not affect the validity of any act performed before October 1, 2011.

(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(6) All employees of the department of general administration engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred to the department of enterprise services, are transferred to the department of enterprise services. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the department of enterprise services to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service law.

(7) Unless or until modified by the public employment relations commission pursuant to RCW 41.80.911:

(a) The bargaining units of employees at the department of general administration existing on October 1, 2011, shall be considered appropriate units at the department of enterprise services and will be so certified by the public employment relations commission.

(b) The exclusive bargaining representatives recognized as representing the bargaining units of employees at the department of general administration existing on October 1, 2011, shall continue as the exclusive bargaining representatives of the transferred bargaining units without the necessity of an election.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 1002.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.